Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE C. PROGRAMS PROVIDING HEALTH CARE BENEFITS AND SERVICES

CHAPTER 64. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 64.001. TEACHING HOSPITAL ACCOUNT. The Department of State Health Services state-owned multi-categorical teaching hospital account is an account in the general revenue fund. Money in the account may be appropriated only to the department to provide funding for indigent health care.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1377, Sec. 3.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0215, eff. April 2, 2015.